Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [42.15] POLICY. new text end new text begin The legislature finds it necessary for the state to ensure public safety, human health, and environmental welfare by protecting citizens against weather modification. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [42.16] SOVEREIGN RIGHT CLAIMED BY STATE. new text end new text begin For the best interest of its residents, the state claims its sovereign right to ensure public safety, human health, and environmental welfare and to protect its citizens within state boundaries and in the airspace above state boundaries. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [42.17] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this chapter, the terms defined in this section have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Modification" means performance or attempted performance of or an activity or attempted activity in connection with the intentional placement, injection, release, or dispersion, by any means, of a chemical, a chemical compound, a substance, or an apparatus into the atmosphere or clouds within the atmosphere, including cloud or atmosphere seeding, for the purpose of producing or attempting to produce a modifying effect to the composition, motion, or resulting behavior of the weather. new text end new text begin (c) "Person" means a person; firm; association; organization; partnership; company; public or private corporation; trust; or federal, county, city, or other public agency. new text end new text begin (d) "Weather" includes but is not limited to the atmosphere, clouds within the atmosphere, temperature, barometric pressure, intensity of sunlight, wind, rain, lightning, hail, sleet, fog, and frost. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [42.18] PROHIBITION. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a person must not engage or attempt to engage in weather modification within the state's sovereign boundaries or in the airspace above the state's boundaries. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [42.19] PENALTY. new text end new text begin A person violating this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, and each day that the violation continues is a separate offense. new text end